src/scripts/Albanian/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021  Non-Routine LLC (inq@louderpages.org)

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Unit  %0:zero |
1:një	 |
2:dy |
3:tre	 |
4:katër	 |
5:pesë |
6:gjashtë |
7:shtatë |
8:tetë |
9:nëntë;

define Teen 1:njëmbëdhjetë |
2:dymbëdhjetë |
3:trembëdhjetë |
4:katërmbëdhjetë |
5:pesëmbëdhjetë |
6:gjashtëmbëdhjetë |
7:shtatëmbëdhjetë |
8:tetëmbëdhjetë |
9:nëntëmbëdhjetë;

define Ten 
1:dhjetë |
2:njëzet | 
3:tridhjetë | 
#4:katërdhjetë | 
4:dyzet | 
5:pesëdhjetë | 
6:gjashtëdhjëtë | 
7:shtatëdhjetë | 
8:tetëdhjetë | 
9:nëntëdhjetë;

define Hundred 1:njëqind |
2:dyqind |
3:treqind |
4:katërqind |
5:pesëqind |
6:gjashtëqind |
7:shtatëqind |
8:tetëqind |
9:nëntëqind;


define TenOrHundredSymbol ten|hnd ; 

# all the permutations of ordinals, because we must have atomic names
# because cases like sing.fem.def and pl.fem.indef are the same (-ta) we will define  by suffix words, not case 

define teOrdUnit   
2:dytë |
3:tretë	 |
4:katërt |
5:pestë |
6:gjashtë |
7:shtatë |
8:tetë |
9:nëntë;

define teOrdTeen Teen ;  # same 

define teOrdTen 
1:dhjetë |
2:njëzetë | 
3:tridhjetë | 
#4:katërdhjetë | 
4:dyzetë | 
5:pesëdhjetë | 
6:gjashtëdhjëtë | 
7:shtatëdhjetë | 
8:tetëdhjetë | 
9:nëntëdhjetë;

define teOrdHundred 
1:njëqindtë |
2:dyqindtë |
3:treqindtë |
4:katërqindtë |
5:pesëqindtë |
6:gjashtëqindtë |
7:shtatëqindtë |
8:tetëqindtë |
9:nëntëqindtë;

# -ta 

define taOrdUnit   
2:dyta |
3:treta	 |
4:katërta	 |
5:pesta |
6:gjashta |
7:shtata |
8:teta |
9:nënta;

define taOrdTeen 
1:njëmbëdhjeta |
2:dymbëdhjeta |
3:trembëdhjeta |
4:katërmbëdhjeta |
5:pesëmbëdhjeta |
6:gjashtëmbëdhjeta |
7:shtatëmbëdhjeta |
8:tetëmbëdhjeta |
9:nëntëmbëdhjeta;

define taOrdTen 
1:dhjeta |
2:njëzeta | 
3:tridhjeta | 
#4:katërdhjeta | 
4:dyzeta | 
5:pesëdhjeta | 
6:gjashtëdhjëta | 
7:shtatëdhjeta | 
8:tetëdhjeta | 
9:nëntëdhjeta;

define taOrdHundred 
1:njëqindta |
2:dyqindta |
3:treqindta |
4:katërqindta |
5:pesëqindta |
6:gjashtëqindta |
7:shtatëqindta |
8:tetëqindta |
9:nëntëqindta;

# -tat

define tatOrdUnit   
2:dytat |
3:tretat	 |
4:katërtat	 |
5:pestat |
6:gjashtat |
7:shtatat |
8:tetat |
9:nëntat;

define tatOrdTeen 
1:njëmbëdhjetat |
2:dymbëdhjetat |
3:trembëdhjetat |
4:katërmbëdhjetat |
5:pesëmbëdhjetat |
6:gjashtëmbëdhjetat |
7:shtatëmbëdhjetat |
8:tetëmbëdhjetat |
9:nëntëmbëdhjetat;

define tatOrdTen 
1:dhjetat |
2:njëzetat | 
3:tridhjetat | 
#4:katërdhjetat | 
4:dyzetat |
5:pesëdhjetat | 
6:gjashtëdhjëtat | 
7:shtatëdhjetat | 
8:tetëdhjetat | 
9:nëntëdhjetat;

define tatOrdHundred 
1:njëqindtat |
2:dyqindtat |
3:treqindtat |
4:katërqindtat |
5:pesëqindtat |
6:gjashtëqindtat |
7:shtatëqindtat |
8:tetëqindtat |
9:nëntëqindtat;

# -tët

define tetOrdUnit   
2:dytët |
3:tretët	 |
4:katërtët	 |
5:pestët |
6:gjashtët |
7:shtatët |
8:tetët |
9:nëntët;

define tetOrdTeen 
1:njëmbëdhjetët |
2:dymbëdhjetët |
3:trembëdhjetët |
4:katërmbëdhjetët |
5:pesëmbëdhjetët |
6:gjashtëmbëdhjetët |
7:shtatëmbëdhjetët |
8:tetëmbëdhjetët |
9:nëntëmbëdhjetët;

define tetOrdTen 
1:dhjetët |
2:njëzetët | 
3:tridhjetët | 
# 4:katërdhjetët | 
4:dyzetët |
5:pesëdhjetët | 
6:gjashtëdhjëtët | 
7:shtatëdhjetët | 
8:tetëdhjetët | 
9:nëntëdhjetët;

define tetOrdHundred 
1:njëqindtët |
2:dyqindtët |
3:treqindtët |
4:katërqindtët |
5:pesëqindtët |
6:gjashtëqindtët |
7:shtatëqindtët |
8:tetëqindtët |
9:nëntëqindtrët;

# - ti 

define tiOrdUnit   
2:dyti |
3:treti	 |
4:katërti	 |
5:pesëti |
6:gjashëti |
7:shtatëti |
8:tetëti |
9:nëntëti;

define tiOrdTeen 
1:njëmbëdhjeti |
2:dymbëdhjeti |
3:trembëdhjeti |
4:katërmbëdhjeti |
5:pesëmbëdhjeti |
6:gjashtëmbëdhjeti |
7:shtatëmbëdhjeti |
8:tetëmbëdhjeti |
9:nëntëmbëdhjeti;

define tiOrdTen 
1:dhjeti |
2:njëzeti | 
3:tridhjeti | 
#4:katërdhjeti | 
4:dyzeti |
5:pesëdhjeti | 
6:gjashtëdhjëti | 
7:shtatëdhjeti | 
8:tetëdhjeti | 
9:nëntëdhjeti;

define tiOrdHundred 
1:njëqindti |
2:dyqindti |
3:treqindti |
4:katërqindti |
5:pesëqindti |
6:gjashtëqindti |
7:shtatëqindti |
8:tetëqindti |
9:nëntëqindti;



# ----------------------------
define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Digit %0|NZDigit ; 


source OrdinalSuffixes.foma

define UnformattedNumber %0 | [NZDigit Digit^<15] ; 
define FormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [%. Digit^3]^{1,4} ; 
define RegularDecimal [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] %, Digit+;   #  3.000.320(,022)
define ForeignDecimal UnformattedNumber %. [Digit^<3 | Digit^>3];   # foreign DP 1.02
define Ordinal	[FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber]  OrdSuffix ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker
define ArabicNumber UnformattedNumber | FormattedNumber | RegularDecimal | ForeignDecimal | Ordinal;

# tag valid numbers
define tagNumberTypes 
 
  [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%, Digit+)  .#. ,,  #  3.000.320(,022)
  # UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. Digit+)  .#.  ,,   # foreign DP 1.02
  UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. [Digit^{1,2} | Digit^>3])  .#.  ,,   # foreign DP 1.02
  [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum ord || .#. _ [%. | OrdSuffix] .#. ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker

source Times.foma 
# We expect this code to be protected from strings contain other than digits, commas and periods.
# We will, however, catch non-numbers which has slipped through, like  20.0.1  or 20,11,111
define tagCascade [  [%,|%.] -> ... dp || wnum  _ Digit+ .#. ]    # place decimal point after whole numbers
   .o.  [ %: -> wnum Hm dp || .#.  Hours _ Minutes .#.]
   .o. [ [%.]:0  -> || _ ?* wnum ]  #  get rid of the thousands dividers
	.o. [ Digit -> ... dec  || dp Digit* _ .#. ]  # mark decimal
	.o. [ dec -> wnum || dp NZDigit Digit^<3 _ .#. ]  # See (1) below, "Un-Decimalize"  
 	.o. [ Digit -> ... wnum || [.#. | \Digit] Digit* _ [ .#. | %. | %, ]];    #  not a whole number, or decimal

# (1) Un-Decimalize For decimal parts, we want any sequence without a leading zero, up to three places, to be read as a whole
# number rather than a list of digits

# by now we have wnum tags for numbers which should be read as whole numbers, dec for those which should be treated differently,# ord tag after wnum, and periods and commas dotted about. 

define tagRules  tagNumberTypes .o. tagCascade; 

# For whole numbers change the markers for singles
define preTranslate [1 thns] -> [1 thn] || _ ,,
  [1 mlns] -> [1 mln] || _ ,,
  [1 blns] -> [1 bln] || _ ,,
  [1 tlns] -> [1 tln] || _ ;
#----------------------------

define PowerOfThousandSymbol thns|mlns|blns|tlns|thn|mln|bln|tln ; 
define PowerOfTenSymbol TenOrHundredSymbol|PowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

# define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 wnum  ; 
 define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 [\dec & \Digit]  ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular [mlns:mln|blns:bln|tlns:tln] -> || [[PowerOfThousandSymbol (and)]|wnum] 1 _ ; 

define RemoveSilentGroups %0^3 (PowerOfThousandSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum ; 

define SeparateHundreds [..] -> hnd ||  Digit _ Digit^2 ?* wnum; 

define Mark100s hnd -> hnd0 || 1 _ {00} ; 

define SeparateTens [..] -> ten ||  Digit _ Digit ?* wnum; 


define RemoveZeros %0  (TenOrHundredSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum |.#.; 

define MarkTeens [[1 ten]:0] NZDigit [0:[teen %0]] -> ; 

define InsertAnds [..] -> and || 
 [.#.|dp] \dp+ _ NZDigit [ [PowerOfThousandSymbol|hnd|teen|ten] %0]* [PowerOfThousandSymbol|hnd|teen|ten|wnum]  ; # puts a single 'and', before the last non-zero element

define RemoveOnes 1 -> 0 || .#. _ thn ; 

# This is poor, should give the different suffixes name, and no reproduce their value here AND in OrdinalSuffixes. But, life is too short.
define  processOrdinals 
 teOrdUnit  @->  ||  _  wnum ord [{-të}|{-t}]  .#. ,,
 taOrdUnit  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 tiOrdUnit  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 tetOrdUnit  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 tatOrdUnit  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. ,,
 [teOrdTeen  teen:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-të}  .#. ,,
 [taOrdTeen  teen:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 [tiOrdTeen teen:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 [tetOrdTeen teen:0]  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 [tatOrdTeen teen:0]  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. ,,
 [teOrdTen ten:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-të}  .#. ,,
 [taOrdTen ten:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 [tiOrdTen ten:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 [tetOrdTen ten:0]  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 [tatOrdTen ten:0]  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. ,,
 [teOrdHundred hnd:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-të}  .#. ,,
 [taOrdHundred hnd:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 [tiOrdHundred hnd:0]  @->  ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 [tetOrdHundred hnd:0]  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 [tatOrdHundred hnd:0]  @-> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. ;

define Translate [ Unit -> || _ wnum | dec | PowerOfThousandSymbol  ,, 
 Unit -> || dp Digit* _ Digit* dec ,,   # right of decimal point
 Teen [teen:0] -> || _ ,, 
 Ten [ten:0] -> || _ ,, 
	Hundred [hnd:0] -> || _ ,, 
	and ->  e || _ ,, 
	%, ->  presje  || _ ?+ .#. ,, 
	%. ->  pikë || _ ?+ .#.  
 ]
 .o. [
# ordinals for mils, blns, trls
 [[thn|thns]:mijtë]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-të}  .#. ,,
 [[thn|thns]:mijta]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 [[thn|thns]:mijti]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 [[thn|thns]:mijtët]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 [[thn|thns]:mijtat]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. ,,
 [[mln|mlns]:miliontë]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-të}  .#. ,,
 [[mln|mlns]:milionta]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 [[mln|mlns]:milionti]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 [[mln|mlns]:miliontët]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 [[mln|mlns]:miliontat]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. ,,
 [[bln|blns]:miliardtë]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-të}  .#. ,,
 [[bln|blns]:miliardta]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 [[bln|blns]:miliardti]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 [[bln|blns]:miliardtët]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 [[bln|blns]:miliardtat]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. ,,
 [[tln|tlns]:triliontë]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-të}  .#. ,,
 [[tln|tlns]:trilionta]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ta}  .#. ,,
 [[tln|tlns]:trilionti]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-ti}  .#. ,,
 [[tln|tlns]:triliontët]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tët}  .#. ,,
 [[tln|tlns]:triliontat]  -> ||  _  wnum ord {-tat}  .#. 
 ]
 .o. [ 
	[thn:mijë | mln:milion | bln:miliard | tln:trilion] -> || _    ,, 
	[thns:mijë | mlns:milion | blns:miliard | tlns:trilion] ->  || _  
	]; 

define NumberRules SeparatePowerOfThousand(thns)  .o. 
 SeparatePowerOfThousand(mlns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(blns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(tlns)  .o. 
RemoveSilentGroups .o. 
SeparateHundreds  .o. 
SeparateTens  .o. 
    #MarkOrdPowerOfThousand .o.
 MarkTeens  
 .o. InsertAnds 
   .o.  RemoveZeros  .o. 
 PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular .o. 
 preTranslate
#.o. RemoveOnes  .o. 
 .o. processOrdinals
 .o.  [%.|%,|wnum] -> zero ... || .#. _   # hack to replace lost zero in front of dec. point
 .o. Translate   .o. [ [ord OrdSuffix]:0 -> || wnum _ .#. ]
 .o. [ Hm:e -> || _ ]
 .o. 	[dp:0|dec:0|wnum:0] -> || _ 
 ;
	


source romans.foma
regex ConvertRomanToDecimal .o. [ArabicNumber | Time] .o. tagRules
  .o. NumberRules 
 ; 
